Indiana, session 2026, HB1381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-8-1-35, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 35. (a) When an accusation in writing, verified by
the oath of any person or in resolutions adopted by a county executive
and county fiscal body in accordance with IC 36-2-8.7 or IC 36-6-4.5,
or a city or town legislative body in accordance with IC 36-1-34.1,
is presented to a circuit court, superior court, or probate court, alleging
that any officer within the jurisdiction of the court has been guilty of:
(1) charging and collecting illegal fees for services rendered or to
be rendered in the officer's office;
(2) refusing, neglecting, or being unable to perform the official
duties pertaining to the officer's office;
(3) in the case of a county officer (as defined in IC 36-2-8.7-1),
failing to be physically present in the county officer's office in
violation of IC 36-2-8.7-7;
(4) violating IC 36-6-4-17(b) if the officer is the executive of a
township; or
HB 1381—LS 7005/DI 87


(5) failing, refusing, or being unable to participate in four (4)
consecutive regular meetings of the county executive, if the
officer is a member of a county executive;
(6) in the case of a fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) of
a second or third class city or town, failing to be physically
present in the fiscal officer's office in violation of
IC 36-1-34.1-6; or
(7) in the case of a fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) of
a second or third class city or town, failing, refusing, or being
unable to participate in four (4) consecutive regular meetings
of the city or town legislative body;
the court must cite the party charged to appear before the court at any
time not more than ten (10) nor less than five (5) days from the time the
accusation was presented, and on that day or some other subsequent
day not more than twenty (20) days from the time the accusation was
presented must proceed to hear, in a summary manner, the accusation
and evidence offered in support of the same, and, if the accused party
appears before the court, the answer and evidence offered by the party
accused. If the accused party does not appear before the court, the court
may proceed to hear and determine the accusation in the accused
party's absence.
(b) If after the hearing under subsection (a) it appears that the
charge is sustained, the court must do the following:
(1) Enter a decree that the party accused be deprived of the party's
office.
(2) Enter a judgment as follows:
(A) For five hundred dollars ($500) in favor of the prosecuting
officer.
(B) For costs as are allowed in civil cases.
(C) For the amount of money that was paid to the officer in
compensation from the day when the accusation was filed
under this section to the day when judgment is entered in favor
of the public entity paying the compensation to the officer.
(c) In an action under this section, a court may award reasonable
attorney's fees, court costs, and other reasonable expenses of litigation
to the accused officer if:
(1) the officer prevails; and
(2) the court finds that the accusation is frivolous or vexatious.
SECTION 2. IC 36-1-34.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 34.1. Removal of a City or Town Fiscal Officer
HB 1381—LS 7005/DI 87


Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to a municipality that is a:
(1) second or third class city; or
(2) town.
Sec. 2. The legislative body of a municipality may petition a
court to remove the municipality's fiscal officer from office under
IC 5-8-1-35 by adopting a resolution in accordance with this
chapter.
Sec. 3. At least one (1) public hearing must be held by the
legislative body of the municipality on the resolution at least ten
(10) business days before the resolution is adopted. The resolution
must contain a concise statement of the underlying basic facts that
support the legislative body's finding that the fiscal officer
committed a violation described in:
(1) section 6 of this chapter;
(2) IC 5-8-1-35(a)(1);
(3) IC 5-8-1-35(a)(2);
(4) IC 5-8-1-35(a)(6); or
(5) IC 5-8-1-35(a)(7).
Sec. 4. The resolution must be adopted by an affirmative vote of
at least a majority of all members of the legislative body of the
municipality.
Sec. 5. The legislative body of the municipality shall certify the
resolution to:
(1) the fiscal officer; and
(2) the clerk of the court in which the action is filed under
IC 5-8-1-35;
not later than ten (10) days after the date the resolution is adopted.
Sec. 6. (a) A fiscal officer must be physically present in the fiscal
officer's office during regular office hours for a reasonable amount
of time each month during the fiscal officer's term of office. A
determination of the reasonable amount of time in which the fiscal
officer must be physically present as well as circumstances relating
to approved hybrid or remote work schedules or other official
duties that may be performed outside of the office shall be set forth
in a policy established by the legislative body.
(b) A fiscal officer may be removed from office by the court
under IC 5-8-1-35, if the fiscal officer is in violation of this section
during one (1) or more months of the fiscal officer's term.
However, it is a defense to any action brought under IC 5-8-1-35
asserting a violation of this section, that the fiscal officer's failure
to be physically present in the fiscal officer's office was due to:
(1) the serious illness of the fiscal officer or the fiscal officer's
HB 1381—LS 7005/DI 87


spouse, parent, child, or stepchild; or
(2) military service of the fiscal officer.
The defense is available in any action brought under IC 5-8-1-35
regardless of whether the action is brought by a person or upon
resolutions adopted by the legislative body of the municipality
under this chapter.
(c) A fiscal officer:
(1) does not violate this section; and
(2) may not be removed from office under IC 5-8-1-35;
for being physically absent from the fiscal officer's office during
any month in which a declaration of a local disaster emergency
under IC 10-14-3-29 is in effect for at least one (1) work day in the
county or municipality in which the fiscal officer's office is located.
HB 1381—LS 7005/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Local Government, to which was
referred House Bill 1381, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1381 as introduced.)
MAY
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1381 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, line 30, after "office." insert "A determination of the
reasonable amount of time in which the fiscal officer must be
physically present as well as circumstances relating to approved
hybrid or remote work schedules or other official duties that may
be performed outside of the office shall be set forth in a policy
established by the legislative body.".
(Reference is to HB 1381 as printed January 20, 2026.)
JOHNSON B
HB 1381—LS 7005/DI 87